Maryland, session 2025, SB0317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
SUBTITLE 21. FOOD FORESTS AND FORAGING PROGRAM.
5–2101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FOOD FOREST” MEANS AN AREA OWNED OR MANAGED BY THE
DEPARTMENT THAT IS DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR FORAGING.
(C) (1) “FORAGING” MEANS HARVESTING PLANT MATERIALS, INCLUDING
SEEDS, NUTS, MUSHROOMS, ROOTS, TUBERS, AND BERRIES FOR NONCOMMERCIAL
PERSONAL CONSUMPTION.
(2) “FORAGING” DOES NOT INCLUDE HARVESTING THREATENED OR
ENDANGERED PLANT SPECIES DESIGNATED UNDER § 10–2A–04 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE FOOD FORESTS AND FORAGING FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–2104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE FOOD FORESTS AND FORAGING PROGRAM.
5–2102.
(A) THERE IS A FOOD FORESTS AND FORAGING PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) DESIGNATE, PLANT, AND MAINTAIN FOOD FORESTS ON STATE
LAND; AND
(2) AUTHORIZE AND REGULATE FORAGING WITHIN FOOD FORESTS.
5–2103.

SENATE BILL 317 3
(A) THERE IS A FORAGING PERMIT.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL OBTAIN A FORAGING PERMIT TO FORAGE WITHIN
A FOOD FOREST.
(C) TO OBTAIN A FORAGING PERMIT, AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, PAY AN
APPLICATION FEE, AS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WAIVE THE PERMIT APPLICATION FEE FOR
AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DEMONSTRATES FINANCIAL NEED.
(E) A FORAGING PERMIT SHALL BE VALID FOR 1 YEAR FOLLOWING THE
DATE OF ISSUANCE.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS:
(1) DESIGNATING FORAGING AREAS WITHIN STATE–OWNED LAND
MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) ESTABLISHING A PERMIT APPLICATION FEE; AND
(3) ESTABLISHING A FEE WAIVER PROCESS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO
DEMONSTRATE FINANCIAL NEED.
5–2104.
(A) THERE IS A FOOD FORESTS AND FORAGING FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE DESIGNATION,
PLANTING, AND MAINTENANCE OF STATE LAND TO BE USED AS FOOD FORESTS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 317
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) PERMIT APPLICATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 5–2103 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) DESIGNATING, PLANTING, AND MAINTAINING FOOD FORESTS;
AND
(2) ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 1–103(B)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.

SENATE BILL 317 5
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE FOOD FORESTS AND FORAGING FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.